California, session 20252026, AB1287.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25206 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:25206. No retailer A licensee shall not dispense any draught beer upon which the proper brand-identified tap sign or draught beer sign is not displayed or the manufacturer or bottler of which has not complied with this article. TheA licensee shall not identify one product and sell another to a consumer. The department may seize any draught beer displayed to the public in violation of this section and may dispose of the beer pursuant to Section 25355.This provision shall not apply to licenses issued by the department for the retail sale of beer on a temporary basis for special events.